Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2352.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 2-15 of the General Laws entitled "Protection of Trees and Plants
Generally" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
2-15-5.1. Terrestrial invasive plants — Prohibition on importation.
(a) No person shall import, disperse, distribute, introduce, or sell, in the state any species
of non-native (exotic) invasive plants, as defined by the director. The director shall promulgate
rules and regulations governing the prohibition and its applicability. The prohibition and its
enforcement shall not become effective until the rules and regulations governing the prohibition
and its applicability take effect.
(b) Violations of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred
dollars ($500).
(c) The director shall maintain a listing of all prohibited plants pursuant to this section
together with a listing of all prohibited aquatic plants pursuant to § 20-1-26.
SECTION 2. Section 20-1-26 of the General Laws in Chapter 20-1 entitled "General
Provisions" is hereby amended to read as follows:
20-1-26. Freshwater invasive aquatic plants — Prohibition on importation and
possession.
(a) No person shall import, transport, disperse, distribute, introduce, sell, purchase, or
possess in the state any species of non-native (exotic) freshwater invasive aquatic plants, as defined

by the director. The director shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the prohibition and
its applicability. The prohibition and its enforcement shall not become effective until the rules and
regulations governing the prohibition and its applicability take effect.
(b) Violations of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred
dollars ($500).
(c) The director shall maintain a listing of all prohibited plants pursuant to this section
together with a listing of all prohibited terrestrial plants pursuant to § 2-15-5.1.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC004299/SUB A
========
LC004299/SUB A - Page 2 of 3